hr-HR: Mogućnost zaključavanja ključa: Poput ključeva; Različito zaključavanje; Kodirani ključ; Glavni ključ; Mogućnost promjene ključa; Ostalo
tr: Kilit anahtarlama seçeneği: Aynı anahtarla açılabilir; Farklı anahtarlı; Kodla eşleştirilmiş; Master anahtarlı; Yeniden anahtarlanabilir; Diğer
hu: Zárolási lehetőség: Azonos kulcsos; Különböző kulcsok; Kódhoz igazítva; Főkulcsos; Átkódolható; Egyéb
pt-BR: Opção de chaveamento de fechadura: Mesma chave; Chaveamento diferente; Chaveado por código; Chave mestra; Rechaveável; Outro
ja: ロックキーオプション: 共通キー; 異なるキー; コードキー; マスターキー; 鍵の再設定可能; その他
sl-SI: Možnost zaklepanja ključavnic: Univerzalna ključavnica; Različno ključi; Prilagojeno kodi; Glavni ključ; Preklopljivo; Druga
en: Lock keying option: Keyed alike; Keyed different; Keyed to code; Master keyed; Rekeyable; Other
da: Låsens nøglekonfiguration: Ens nøgle; Forskellig nøgle; Nøglet til kode; Med masternøgle; Kan nøgles igen; Andet
zh-TW: 鎖心配置選項: 同類鑰匙; 獨立鎖; 鑰匙代碼; 主鑰匙; 可重配鑰匙; 其他
de: Schließschlüsseloption: Gleichschließend; Verschiedenschließend; Schlüsselcode; Hauptschlüssel; Codierbar; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Opțiune de blocare cu cheie: Cu cheie identică; Chei diferite; Chei pe cod; Cheie principală; Recodabil; Altele
el: Επιλογή κλειδώματος (keying): Με ίδιο κλειδί; Διαφορετικά κλειδωμένα; Πληκτρολογημένο στον κώδικα; Κύριο κλειδί; Επανακλειδώσιμο; Άλλο
nl: Sleuteloptie: Met dezelfde sleutel; Verschillende sleutels; Zelfde sleutel volgens code; Hoofdsleutelsysteem; Hersluitbaar; Overig
zh-CN: 锁芯配钥匙选项: 总控钥匙; 独立钥匙; 按码配匙; 主钥匙; 可重新配钥匙; 其他
th: ตัวเลือกการไขกุญแจ: คีย์อะไลค์; แบบกุญแจต่างดอก; กำหนดระบบกุญแจตามโค้ด; ระบบกุญแจมาสเตอร์คีย์; สามารถเปลี่ยนรหัสกุญแจได้; อื่นๆ
es: Opción de llaves de la cerradura: Con la misma llave; Clave diferente; Con clave de código; Llave maestra; Recombinable; Otros
sv: Låsnyckelalternativ: Likadana nycklar; Olika nycklar; Nyckelrad till kod; Huvudnyckel; Omnyckelbar; Övrigt
vi: Tùy chọn chìa khóa của ổ khóa: Chung chìa khóa; Chìa khóa riêng biệt; Làm chìa theo mã số; Hệ thống chìa chủ; Có thể thay đổi lõi khóa; Khác
cs: Možnost konfigurace klíčů zámku: Stejný klíč; Nezaměnitelné klíče (Keyed different); Výroba podle kódu (Keyed to code); Systém hlavního klíče (Master keyed); Přestavitelný zámek (Rekeyable); Jiné
it: Opzione di blocco con chiave: Con chiavi simili; Chiave diversa; Codificato secondo il codice; Chiave principale; Riprogrammabile; Altro
ru: Вариант запирания замка ключом: Один ключ; Разные ключи; Кодированный; С мастер-ключом; С возможностью перекодировки; Другое
bg-BG: Опция за заключване с ключ: Еднакви ключове; С различен ключ; Ключ по код; С главен ключ; Прекодируемо; Друго
fi: Lukon avainjärjestelmän vaihtoehto: Samat avaimet; Erilainen sarjoitus; Koodattu; Pääavain; Uudelleen sarjoitettava; Muu
fr: Système de clé du dispositif de verrouillage: Clés identiques; Clé différente; Clé codée; Système à clé passe-partout; Clé reconfigurable; Autre
nb: Alternativ for nøkkelformat: Tastet likt; Annerledes tastet; Kodet til kode; Masternøkkel; Kan kodes på nytt; Annet
ko: 잠금장치 키 구성 옵션: 동일한 키; 개별 키 방식; 코드 키 방식; 마스터 키 방식; 키 교체 가능; 기타
sk-SK: Možnosť uzamknutia kľúčom: Rovnaký kľúč; Rôzne kľúče; Kódované podľa kľúča; Hlavný kľúč; S možnosťou prestavenia; Iné
pl: Opcja zamykania na klucz: Podobny do klucza; Różne klucze; Kodowane; System master key; Możliwość ponownego zakodowania; Pozostałe
lt-LT: Spynos raktų konfigūracija: Tuo pačiu raktu rakinama; Skirtingai užkoduota; Priskirta prie kodo; Pagrindinis raktas; Perkoduojamas; Kita
pt-PT: Opção de fechadura com chave: Chaves iguais; Chaves diferentes; Com código; Chave mestra; Reconfigurável; Outro